Washington statutes.
RCW 4.56.190

Lien of judgment.

The real estate of any judgment debtor, and such as the judgment debtor may acquire, not exempt by law, shall be held and bound to satisfy any judgment of the district court of the United States rendered in this state and any judgment of the supreme court, court of appeals, superior court, or district court of this state, and every such judgment shall be a lien thereupon to commence as provided in RCW 4.56.200 and to run for a period of not to exceed ten years from the day on which such judgment was entered unless the ten-year period is extended in accordance with RCW 6.17.020(3), or unless the judgment results from a criminal sentence for a crime that was committed on or after July 1, 2000, in which case the lien will remain in effect until the judgment is fully satisfied. As used in this chapter, real estate shall not include the vendor's interest under a real estate contract for judgments rendered after August 23, 1983. If a judgment debtor owns real estate, subject to execution, jointly or in common with any other person, the judgment shall be a lien on the interest of the defendant only.

Personal property of the judgment debtor shall be held only from the time it is actually levied upon.

[ 2011 c 106 s 4; 1994 c 189 s 3. Prior: 1987 c 442 s 1103; 1987 c 202 s 116; 1983 1st ex.s. c 45 s 5; 1980 c 105 s 3; 1971 c 81 s 16; 1929 c 60 s 1; RRS s 445; prior: 1893 c 42 s 9; Code 1881 s 321; 1869 p 78 s 317; 1860 p 51 s 234; 1857 p 11 s 15; 1854 p 175 s 240.]

NOTES:

Finding—2011 c 106: See note following RCW 10.82.090.

Application—1987 c 442 s 1103: "The amendment of RCW 4.56.190 by this act applies only to judgments entered after July 26, 1987." [ 1987 c 442 s 1104.]

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.

Application—1980 c 105: See note following RCW 4.16.020.

Repeal and saving—1929 c 60: "That chapter XXVIII (28), sections 320, 321, 322, and chapter XXIX (29), sections 323 and 324, and section 753 of the Code of Washington Territory of 1881; an act entitled 'An Act relating to the filing and recording of transcripts of judgments rendered in this state by the district or circuit courts of the United States', approved February 19, 1890, Laws of 1889/90, pages 97 to 98; section 5 of chapter XXXVIII (38) of the Laws of 1891, pages 77 to 78; chapter LXXXIV (84) of the Laws of 1891, pages 165 to 166; chapter XLII (42) of the Laws of 1893 pages 65 to 67, and chapter XXXIX (39) of the Laws of 1897, pages 52 to 53, chapter XI of the Laws of 1897, page 10, (sections 445, 446, 447, 450, 451, 452, 453, 454, 455, 456, 458, 459, 460, 461, 462 and 463 of Remington's Compiled Statutes; sections 8111, 8112, 8113, 8114, 8115, 8116, 8117, 8118, 8119, 8120, 8121, 8125, 8126, 8163, 8164 and 8165 of Pierce's Code) are hereby repealed: PROVIDED, That such repeal shall not be construed as affecting any rights acquired or the validity of any act done or proceeding had or pending under the provisions of any of said acts repealed." [ 1929 c 60 s 9.]

Entry of judgments—Superior court—District court—Small claims: RCW 6.01.020.

Execution of judgments: RCW 6.17.020.